New York, session 2025-2026, S9545.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 529 of the racing, pari-mutuel wagering and breed- 2 ing law is amended by adding a new subdivision 3 to read as follows: 3 3. Notwithstanding subdivision two of this section, for a regional 4 off-track betting corporation that is comprised in the capital district, 5 one hundred percent of the balance of such account remaining unclaimed 6 as of the last day of February of such year shall be distributed pursu- 7 ant to section five hundred sixteen of this chapter to participating 8 counties comprising the capital district corporation by March fifteenth. 9 A penalty of five percent and interest at the rate of one percent per 10 month from the due date to the date of payment of the unclaimed balance 11 due April first shall be payable in case such balance is not paid when 12 due under this section. 13 § 2. Subdivision 3 of section 136 of the racing, pari-mutuel wagering 14 and breeding law, as added by section 1 of subpart A of part FF of chap- 15 ter 59 of the laws of 2025, is amended to read as follows: 16 3. All pari-mutuel wagering taxes shall be collected and remitted in 17 the same manner as such taxes were collected and remitted prior to the 18 enactment of this section; provided however, for a regional off-track 19 betting corporation that is comprised in the capital district, shall 20 remit such payments to participating counties in the same fashion as 21 required by section five hundred sixteen of this chapter. 22 § 3. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD14403-02-6